District of Columbia statutes.
Not funded

50-211.03

Program establishment

[Not funded].

History

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-223, § 103, 59 DCR 13537

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-211.02.

Editor's Notes

Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-223 provided that §§ 103, 105(c), and 201(d) of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.